Utah statutes.
41-6a-207.   Uniform application of chapter -- Effect of local ordinances.

(1)  The provisions of this chapter are applicable throughout this state and in all of its political subdivisions and municipalities.

(2)  A local highway authority may not enact or enforce any rule or ordinance in conflict with the provisions of this chapter. 

(3)  A local highway authority may adopt:

(a)  ordinances consistent with this chapter; and

(b)  additional traffic ordinances not in conflict with this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

